District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.10

Sales tickets.

Every person, firm, or corporation shall, when a sales ticket is given with a purchase, cause such sales ticket to show the correct name and address of such person, firm, or corporation and the weight, measure, or numerical count, as the case may be, of each commodity sold to the purchaser, and every such person, firm, or corporation is hereby required to deliver such sales ticket to such purchaser when requested to do so by such purchaser at the time of sale.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1219, ch. 118, § 10
1981 Ed., § 10-111.
1973 Ed., § 10-110.